California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a board from suspending or revoking a license or certificate pursuant to any other provision of law.

(5) “Board,” as used in this subdivision, means the Dental Board of California, the Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Board of Psychology, the California
 State Board of Optometry, the California State Board of Pharmacy, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

(6) “More than one conviction,” as used in this subdivision, means that the licensee or certificate holder has one or more convictions prior to January 1, 2004, and at least one conviction on or after that date, or the licensee or certificate holder has two or more convictions on or after January 1, 2004. However, a licensee or certificate holder who has one or more convictions prior to January 1, 2004, but who has no convictions and is currently licensed or holds a certificate after that date, does not have “more than one conviction” for the purposes of this subdivision.

(d) As used in this section,
 health care professional means any person licensed or certified pursuant to this division, or licensed
 pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 15.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12.5. Mental Illness or Physical Illness [820. - 828.]

820.

Whenever it appears that any person holding a license, certificate or permit under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division may be unable to practice his or her profession safely because the licentiate’s ability to practice is impaired due to mental illness, or physical illness affecting competency, the licensing agency may order the licentiate to be examined by one or more physicians and surgeons or psychologists designated by the agency. The report of the examiners shall be made available to the licentiate and may be received as direct evidence in proceedings conducted pursuant to Section 822.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1104, Sec. 1.7.)
-------------------------------------------

821.

The licentiate’s failure to comply with an order issued under Section 820 shall constitute grounds for the suspension or revocation of the licentiate’s certificate or license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1183, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

If a licensing agency determines that its licentiate’s ability to practice his or her profession safely is impaired because the licentiate is mentally ill, or physically ill affecting competency, the licensing agency may take action by any one of the following methods:

(a) Revoking the licentiate’s certificate or license.

(b) Suspending the licentiate’s right to practice.

(c) Placing the licentiate on probation.

(d) Taking such other action in relation to the licentiate as the licensing agency in its discretion deems proper.

The licensing agency shall not reinstate a revoked or suspended certificate or license until it has received competent evidence of the absence or control of the condition which caused its action and until it is satisfied that with due regard for the public health and safety the person’s right to practice his or her profession may be safely reinstated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1183, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

823.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, reinstatement of a licentiate against whom action has been taken pursuant to Section 822 shall be governed by the procedures in this article. In reinstating a certificate or license which has been revoked or suspended under Section 822, the licensing agency may impose terms and conditions to be complied with by the licentiate after the certificate or license has been reinstated. The authority of the licensing agency to impose terms and conditions includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Requiring the licentiate to obtain additional professional training and to pass an examination upon the completion of the training.

(b) Requiring the licentiate to pass an oral, written, practical, or clinical examination, or any combination thereof to determine his or her present fitness to engage in the practice of his or her profession.

(c) Requiring the licentiate to submit to a complete diagnostic examination by one or more physicians and surgeons or psychologists appointed by the licensing agency. If the licensing agency requires the licentiate to submit to such an examination, the licensing agency shall receive and consider any other report of a complete diagnostic examination given by one or more physicians and surgeons or psychologists of the licentiate’s choice.

(d) Requiring the licentiate to undergo continuing treatment.

(e) Restricting or limiting the extent, scope or type of practice of the licentiate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1183, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

824.

The licensing agency may proceed against a licentiate under either Section 820, or 822, or under both sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1183, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

825.

As used in this article with reference to persons holding licenses as physicians and surgeons, “licensing agency” means a panel of the Division of Medical Quality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

The proceedings under Sections 821 and 822 shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the licensing agency and the licentiate shall have all the rights and powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1183, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to public meetings, the licensing agency may convene in closed session to consider any evidence relating to the licentiate’s mental or physical illness obtained pursuant to the proceedings under Section 820. The licensing agency shall only convene in closed session to the extent that it is necessary to protect the privacy of a licentiate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1183, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

If the licensing agency determines, pursuant to proceedings conducted under Section 820, that there is insufficient evidence to bring an action against the licentiate pursuant to Section 822, then all licensing agency records of the proceedings, including the order for the examination, investigative reports, if any, and the report of the physicians and surgeons or psychologists, shall be kept confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena. If no further proceedings are conducted to determine the licentiates fitness to practice during a period of five years from the date of the determination by the licensing agency of the proceeding pursuant to Section 820, then the licensing agency shall purge and destroy all records pertaining to the proceedings. If new proceedings are instituted during the five-year period against the licentiate by the licensing agency, the records, including the report of the physicians and surgeons or psychologists, may be used in the proceedings and shall be available to the respondent pursuant to the provisions of Section 11507.6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1183, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Standards for Licensure or Certification [850. - 856.]

850.

No healing arts licensing board or examining committee under the Department of Consumer Affairs shall by regulation require an applicant for licensure or certification to be a member of, to be certified by, to be eligible to be certified or registered by, or otherwise meet the standards of a specified private voluntary association or professional society except as provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

850.1.

(a) A healing arts board shall not deny an application for licensure or suspend, revoke, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee or health care practitioner subject to this division on the basis of a civil judgment, criminal conviction, or disciplinary action in another state if that judgment, conviction, or disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive sensitive services that would be lawful if provided in this state, regardless of the patient’s location.

(b) This section does not apply to a civil judgment, criminal conviction, or disciplinary action imposed in another state based upon conduct in
 another state that would subject an applicant, licensee, or health care practitioner subject to this division to a similar claim, charge, or action under the laws of this state.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Healing arts board” means any board, division, or examining committee in the Department of Consumer Affairs that licenses or certifies health professionals.

(2) “Sensitive services” has the same meaning as in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 258, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260.)
-------------------------------------------

850.1.

(a) A healing arts board shall not deny an application for licensure or suspend, revoke, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee or health care practitioner subject to this division on the basis of a civil judgment, criminal conviction, or disciplinary action in another state if that judgment, conviction, or disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive sensitive services that would be lawful if provided in this state, regardless of the patient’s location.

(b) This section does not apply to a civil judgment, criminal conviction, or disciplinary action imposed in another state based upon conduct in another state that would subject an applicant, licensee, or
 health care practitioner subject to this division to a similar claim, charge, or action under the laws of this state.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Healing arts board” means any board, division, or examining committee in the Department of Consumer Affairs that licenses or certifies health professionals.

(2) “Sensitive services” has the same meaning as in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 2.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.   See same-numbered section as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

850.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “healing arts board” means any board, division, or examining committee in the Department of Consumer Affairs that licenses or certifies health professionals.

(b) A healing arts board shall require a licensee or registrant who electronically renews their license or registration to provide to that board the licensee’s or registrant’s individual National Provider Identifier, if they
 have one.

(c) A violation of this section shall not constitute a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.   (AB 1991)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

850.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other state law, and consistent with Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution, an individual or state or local officer shall not commence a criminal, civil, professional discipline, or licensing action against an individual licensed or certified by a healing arts board concerning the manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.

(b) A healing arts board shall not suspend a license, revoke a license, or
 otherwise take disciplinary action against a licensee solely on the basis that the licensee manufactured, transported, distributed, delivered, received, acquired, sold, possessed, furnished, dispensed, repackaged, or stored brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.

(c) A healing arts board shall not deny an application for licensure, or suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee or health care practitioner subject to this division solely because the licensee or practitioner was convicted or disciplined in another state solely for an activity related to brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that, if performed in this state, would not be grounds for denial, suspension, revocation, or other
 discipline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

851.

A healing arts licensure board or examining committee may by regulation require an applicant for licensure or certification to meet the standards of a specified private voluntary association or professional society when either of the following conditions is met:

(a) There is direct statutory authority or requirement that the board or examining committee utilize the standards of the specified private voluntary association or professional society; or

(b) The board or examining committee specifies in the regulation the amount of education, training, experience, examinations, or other requirements of the private voluntary association or professional society, which standards shall be consistent with the provisions of law regulating such licensees, and the board or examining committee adopts such standards in public hearing. The board or examining committee may, by regulation, require an applicant to successfully complete an examination conducted by or created by a relevant national certification association, testing firm, private voluntary association, or professional society.

Nothing in this section authorizes the Medical Board of California to limit the licensure of physicians and surgeons by specialty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 886, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

852.

The performance, recommendation, or provision of any legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1798.300 of the Civil Code, by a licensee or a health care practitioner subject to this division acting within their scope of practice, for a patient who resides in a state in which the performance, recommendation, or provision of that legally protected health care activity is illegal, shall not, by itself, constitute professional misconduct under this division or any regulation governing the licensure,
 certification, or authorization of that licensee or practitioner, nor shall any license, certification, or authorization of a licensee or health care practitioner subject to this division be revoked, suspended, or annulled or otherwise subject to any other penalty or discipline provided in this division solely on the basis that the licensee or health care practitioner performed, recommended, or provided any legally protected health care activity for a patient who resides in a state in which the
 performance, recommendation, or provision of that legally protected health service is illegal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 3.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

854.

Criteria for issuing three-year nonrenewable medical licenses and dental permits under this article shall not be utilized at any time as the standard for issuing a license to practice medicine or a permit to practice dentistry in California on a permanent basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1157, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

855.

(a) Up to 70 international medical graduates who have passed their United States medical license examination on the first attempt and who have been working in the medical field in the capacity of a medical assistant, a nurse practitioner, a nurse-midwife, a physician assistant, a dental hygienist, or a quality assurance and peer review specialist for not less than three years, shall be selected to participate in a pilot program. Preference shall be given to international medical graduates who are residents of California, have experience working in communities whose language is other than English and whose culture is not from the dominant society, and have a proven level of literacy in the foreign language of a medically underserved community.

(b) If there are not 70 international medical graduates who meet the criteria of subdivision (a), the remaining openings may be filled by participants who have passed the United States medical license examination on two or more attempts, have been working in the medical field in the capacity of a medical assistant, a nurse practitioner, a nurse-midwife, a physician assistant, a dental hygienist, or a quality assurance and peer review specialist for not less than three years, and who pass an additional test to be determined by the medical facility and the medical school participating in the pilot program. Preference shall be given to international medical graduates who are residents of California, have experience working in communities whose language is other than English and whose culture is not from the dominant society, and have a proven level of literacy in the foreign language of a medically underserved community.

(c) An international medical graduate shall not be eligible for this program if he or she has not graduated from a school in good standing that is recognized by the Medical Board of California.

(d) Upon selection for the pilot program, participants may submit an application to the International Medical Graduate Liaison of the Medical Board of California’s Division of Licensing, with the appropriate fee, to initiate the medical licensing review process, providing the participant time to remediate any deficiency during the three-year international medical graduates pilot program.

(e) All program participants shall be required to have the foreign language fluency and the cultural knowledge necessary to serve the non-English-speaking community at the nonprofit community health center where they practice.

(f) The Medical Board of California shall issue an applicant status letter to participating and qualifying international medical graduates.

(g) International medical graduates shall be required to participate and satisfactorily complete a six-month orientation program that will address medical protocol, community clinic history and operations, medical administration, hospital operations and protocol, medical ethics, the California medical delivery system, health maintenance organizations and managed care practices, and pharmacology differences. International medical graduates who have passed the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) language exam shall not be required to be enrolled in English language classes. However, if a participating international medical graduate has not passed the ECFMG language exam, he or she shall be enrolled in English language acquisition classes until he or she obtains a level of English language proficiency equivalent to the ECFMG language exam.

(h) (1) Upon satisfactorily completing the orientation program and the one-year residency training program, international medical graduates shall be selected by nonprofit community health centers to work in nonprofit community health centers and disproportionate share hospitals whose service areas include federally designated Health Professional Shortage Areas, Dental Professional Shortage Areas, Medically Underserved Areas, and Medically Underserved Populations for a period not to exceed three years.

(2) There shall be two residency programs operated under the auspices of a medical school in good standing, with one in southern California and one in northern California. These residency programs shall be in family practice, internal medicine, or obstetrics and gynecology.

(3) After successfully completing the one-year residency program, the training institution for the one-year residency program for international medical graduates may transfer the program participant into an approved residency program.

(i) (1) All program participants shall be required to satisfy the medical curriculum requirements of Section 2089, the clinical instruction requirements of Section 2089.5, and the examination requirements of Section 2170 prior to being admitted into an approved residency program.

(2) Those international medical graduates who are transferred into an approved residency program shall be required to work in nonprofit community health centers or disproportionate share hospitals whose service areas include federally designated Health Professional Shortage Areas, Dental Professional Shortage Areas, Medically Underserved Areas, and Medically Underserved Populations for not less than three years after being fully licensed.

(j) For individuals in this program as specified in this section, the applicant status letter shall be deemed a license in good standing pursuant to the provisions of this article for the purpose of participation and reimbursement in all federal, state, and local health programs, including managed care organizations and health maintenance organizations.

(k) (1) The Director of General Medical Education or an equivalent position in the training institution of the one-year residency program for international medical graduates shall have the authority to make a recommendation to the Medical Board of California for the full medical licensure of an international medical graduate who has successfully completed the one-year residency program if the director believes, based on the performance and competency of the international medical graduate, that the international medical graduate should be fully licensed.

(2) After reviewing the recommendation for full licensure from the director, the Medical Board of California shall have the authority to issue a permanent license to practice medicine in this state to the international medical graduate.

(l) If an international medical graduate desires to secure a permanent license to practice medicine from the board, he or she shall, among other things, be required to be admitted into an approved residency program.

(m) The Medical Board of California, in consultation with medical schools located in California, executive and medical directors of nonprofit community health centers, and with hospital administrators, shall provide oversight review of the implementation of this program. The Medical Board of California shall ensure that funding proposals by appropriate institutions to implement these provisions meet the necessary funding thresholds to fulfill the intent of this program. Implementation of this program may not proceed unless appropriate funding is secured. The Medical Board of California shall report to the Legislature every January the program is operational regarding the status of the program and the ability of the program to secure the funding necessary to carry out its required provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

(a) (1) A person licensed pursuant to this division who is required to complete continuing education units as a condition of renewing his or her license may, once per renewal cycle, apply one unit of continuing education credit, pursuant to paragraph (2), towards that requirement for attending a course that results in the licensee becoming a certified instructor of cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) or the proper use of an automated external defibrillator (AED).

(2) A licensee may only apply continuing education credit for attending one of the following courses:

(A) An instructional program
 developed by the American Heart Association.

(B) An instructional program developed by the American Red Cross.

(C) An instructional program that is nationally recognized and based on the most current national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for the performance of CPR and the use of an AED.

(b) A person licensed pursuant to this division who is required to complete continuing education units as a condition of renewing his or her license may, once per renewal cycle, apply up to two units of continuing education
 credit towards that requirement for conducting CPR or AED training sessions for employees of school districts and community college districts in the state.

(c) For purposes of this section, “unit” means any measurement for continuing education, such as hours or course credits.

(d) This section shall
 only apply to a person licensed under this division if the applicable licensing board’s laws or regulations establishing continuing education requirements include the courses or activities described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   (AB 333)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Gerontology and Geriatric Training for the Healing Arts [860. - 860.]

860.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) California’s system of care suffers from a severe shortage of professionals and paraprofessionals in the healing arts to administer programs and provide services for older adults.

(2) As a result of rapidly changing age demographics in California, it is essential that we prepare a sufficient number of competent and qualified professionals and paraprofessionals in the healing arts to administer programs for, and provide services to, California’s older adults and adults with disabilities.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to require various professionals and paraprofessionals in the healing arts to complete certain educational requirements in aging and long-term care as a condition or licensure or renewal of licensure, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Sexual Orientation Change Efforts [865. - 865.2.]

865.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms   shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Mental health provider” means a physician and surgeon specializing in the practice of psychiatry, a psychologist, a psychological assistant, intern, or trainee, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a registered associate marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist trainee, a licensed educational psychologist, a credentialed school psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, an associate clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a registered associate clinical counselor, a professional clinical counselor trainee, or any other person designated as a mental health professional under California law or regulation.

(b) (1) “Sexual orientation change efforts” means any practices by mental health providers that seek to change an individual’s sexual orientation. This includes efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions, or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same sex.

(2) “Sexual orientation change efforts” does not include psychotherapies that: (A) provide acceptance, support, and understanding of clients or the facilitation of clients’ coping, social support, and identity exploration and development, including sexual orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices; and (B) do not seek to change sexual orientation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 3.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

865.1.

Under no circumstances shall a mental health provider engage in sexual orientation change efforts with a patient under 18 years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 835, Sec. 2.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

865.2.

Any sexual orientation change efforts attempted on a patient under 18 years of age by a mental health provider shall be considered unprofessional conduct and shall subject a mental health provider to discipline by the licensing entity for that mental health provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 835, Sec. 2.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.2. Expedited licensure process [870. - 870.]

870.

(a) The Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Physician Assistant Board shall expedite the licensure process for an applicant who demonstrates that they intend to provide abortions, as defined in Section 123464 of the Health and Safety Code, within the scope of practice of their license.

(b) An applicant shall demonstrate their intent to provide abortions by providing a letter declaring the applicant’s intention to provide abortions and
 a letter from an employer or health care entity indicating that the applicant has accepted employment or entered into a contract to provide abortions, the applicant’s starting date, the location where the applicant will be providing abortions, and that the applicant will be providing abortions within the scope of practice of their license in accordance with Sections 2253, 2725.4, and 3502.4, as applicable.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as changing existing licensure requirements. An applicant applying for expedited licensure under subdivision (a) shall meet all applicable statutory and regulatory licensure requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 560, Sec. 2.   (AB 657)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Exemption From Licensure [900. - 901.]

900.

(a) Nothing in this division applies to a health care practitioner licensed in another state or territory of the United States who offers or provides health care for which he or she is licensed, if the health care is provided only during a state of emergency as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 8558 of the Government Code, which emergency overwhelms the response capabilities of California health care practitioners and only upon the request of the Director of the Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(b) The director shall be the medical control and shall designate the licensure and specialty health care practitioners required for the specific emergency and shall designate the areas
 to which they may be deployed.

(c) Health care practitioners shall provide, upon request, a valid copy of a professional license and a photograph identification issued by the state in which the practitioner holds licensure before being deployed by the director.

(d) Health care practitioners deployed pursuant to this chapter shall provide the appropriate California licensing authority with verification of licensure upon request.

(e) Health care practitioners providing health care pursuant to this chapter shall have immunity from liability for services rendered as specified in Section 8659 of the Government Code.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “health care practitioner” means any person who engages in acts which are the subject of licensure or
 regulation under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division.

(g) For purposes of this section, “director” means the Director of the Emergency Medical Services Authority who shall have the powers specified in Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 270, Sec. 1.   (AB 2699)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

901.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Committee” means the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.

(2) “Health care practitioner” means any person who engages in acts that are the subject of licensure or regulation under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division and who maintains an active license in good standing to provide the same or substantially similar services in another state, territory, or country.

(3) “Olympic and Paralympic activities” means any competition, non competition, athlete village, training,
 or support sites in this state sanctioned by the committee.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any licensure, certification, or registration requirements of this division shall not apply to a health care practitioner licensed in another state, territory, or country while providing professional services for which a license would otherwise be required in this state if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The health care practitioner has been invited by the committee to provide professional services at Olympic and Paralympic activities.

(2) The committee provides to the Director of Consumer Affairs, to forward to the applicable licensing entity within the department that corresponds to the licensing entity in the state, territory, or country where the health care practitioner is licensed before the provision of
 professional services by a health care practitioner, all of the following information:

(A) The name of the health care practitioner.

(B) The state, territory, or country of the health care practitioner’s licensure and the licensing entity from which the health care practitioner holds a license.

(C) The dates for which the health care practitioner has been invited to provide professional services.

(D) The scope of practice the committee requires for that practitioner at Olympic and Paralympic activities.

(c) The exemption granted under this section shall be limited to only those professional services required by or on behalf of the committee. Those professional services shall be within the
 scope of the health care practitioner’s existing licensure, certification, or registration and shall only be provided at Olympic and Paralympic activities.

(d) A health care practitioner shall cease to be exempted under this section upon a request made by the department to the committee on behalf of an applicable licensing entity.

(e) The exemption provided in this section shall remain in force while the health care practitioner is providing professional services at the invitation of the committee and only during the time sanctioned by the committee.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, in the event the consent of the parent, guardian, or legal representative of a team member cannot be obtained, the official team representative who is responsible for any member participating in Olympic and
 Paralympic activities may give consent to the furnishing of professional services to a team member who, due to age, disability, or injury, is not able to personally consent.

(2) Consent given pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be subject to disaffirmance or invalidation due to the individual’s age, disability, or injury.

(3) In the case of an emergency, the consent of the parent, guardian, or legal representative of the team member shall not be necessary in order to authorize the performance of professional services.

(g) This section does not apply to persons who engage in acts that are subject to licensure or regulation pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) or Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 4430).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.6. Health Care Professional Disaster Response Act [920. - 922.]

920.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Professional Disaster Response Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1085, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

921.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) In times of national or state disasters, a shortage of qualified health care practitioners may exist in areas throughout the state where they are desperately required to respond to public health emergencies.

(2) Health care practitioners with lapsed or inactive licenses could potentially serve in those areas where a shortage of qualified health care practitioners exists, if licensing requirements were streamlined and fees curtailed.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to address these matters through the provisions of the Health Care Professional Disaster Response Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1085, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

922.

(a) A physician and surgeon who satisfies the requirements of Section 2439 but whose license has been expired for less than five years may be licensed under this chapter.

(b) To be licensed under this chapter, a physician and surgeon shall complete an application, on a form prescribed by the Medical Board of California, and submit it to the board, along with the following:

(1) Documentation that the applicant has completed the continuing education requirements described in Article 10 (commencing with Section 2190) of Chapter 5 for each renewal period during which the applicant was not licensed.

(2) A complete set of fingerprints as required by Sections 144 and 2082, together with the fee required for processing those fingerprints.

(c) An applicant shall not be required to pay any licensing, delinquency, or penalty fees for the issuance of a license under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1085, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Chiropractors [1000. - 1058.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [1000. - 1007.]

1000.

(a) The law governing practitioners of chiropractic is found in an initiative act entitled “An act prescribing the terms upon which licenses may be issued to practitioners of chiropractic, creating the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners and declaring its powers and duties, prescribing penalties for violation hereof, and repealing all acts and parts of acts inconsistent herewith,” adopted by the electors November 7, 1922.

(b) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners is within the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, as set forth in this article and under the act creating the board, shall be subject to
 review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 623, Sec. 1.   (SB 1434)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.
